es: Grado de los huevos: Clase A; Clase B; Clase C; Grado A; Grado AA; Grado B; Calidad Lion; Otro
pt-PT: Grau do ovo: Classe A; Classe B; Classe C; Grau A; Grau AA; Grau B; Qualidade Lion; Outro
ko: 계란 등급: A등급; B등급; C등급; A등급; AA등급; B등급; 라이언 퀄리티; 기타
hr-HR: Ocjena jaja: Klasa A; Klasa B; Klasa C; Razred A; Razred AA; Razred B; Lion Quality; Ostalo
ro-RO: Calitatea ouălor: Categoria A; Categoria B; Categoria C; Gradul A; Gradul AA; Gradul B; Calitatea Lion; Altele
sk-SK: Trieda vajec: Trieda A; Trieda B; Trieda C; Trieda A; Trieda AA; Trieda B; Lion Quality; Iné
en: Egg grade: Class A; Class B; Class C; Grade A; Grade AA; Grade B; Lion Quality; Other
zh-TW: 雞蛋等級: A 級; B 級; C 級; A 級; AA 級; B 級; Lion Quality (紅獅認證); 其他
nl: Ei klasse: Klasse A; Klasse B; Klasse C; Graad A; Graad AA; Graad B; Lion Quality; Overige
sv: Äggkvalitet: Klass A; Klass B; Klass C; Klass A; Klass AA; Klass B; Lion Quality; Övrigt
pt-BR: Grau do ovo: Classe A; Classe B; Classe C; Tipo A; Tipo AA; Tipo B; Lion Quality; Outro
it: Grado uova: Classe A; Classe B; Classe C; Grado A; Grado AA; Grado B; Lion Quality; Altro
ru: Категория качества яиц: Класс A; Класс B; Класс C; Категория A; Категория AA; Категория B; Lion Quality; Другое
cs: Jakostní třída vajec: Třída A; Třída B; Třída C; Jakost A; Jakost AA; Jakost B; Lion Quality; Jiné
zh-CN: 鸡蛋等级: A 级; B 级; C 级; A 级; AA 级; B 级; Lion Quality; 其他
ja: 卵のグレード: クラスA; クラスB; クラスC; グレードA; グレードAA; グレードB; ライオンクオリティ; その他
da: Æggekvalitet: Klasse A; Klasse B; Klasse C; Kvalitet A; Kvalitet AA; Kvalitet B; Lion Quality; Andet
fr: Catégorie de qualité des œufs: Catégorie A; Catégorie B; Catégorie C; Catégorie A; Catégorie AA; Catégorie B; Qualité Lion; Autre
th: ระดับคุณภาพไข่: คลาส A; คลาส B; คลาส C; เกรด A; เกรด AA; เกรด B; Lion Quality; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Клас яйца: Клас A; Клас B; Клас C; Клас A; Клас AA; Клас B; Lion Quality; Друго
de: Eierqualitätsstufe: Klasse A; Klasse B; Klasse C; Güteklasse A; Güteklasse AA; Güteklasse B; Lion Quality; Sonstige
tr: Yumurta kalitesi: A sınıfı; B sınıfı; C sınıfı; A kalitesi; AA kalitesi; B kalitesi; Lion kalitesi; Diğer
sl-SI: Jajčna stopnja: Razred A; Razred B; Razred C; Kategorija A; Kategorija AA; Kategorija B; Kakovost Lion; Drugo
vi: Cấp độ trứng: Hạng A; Hạng B; Hạng C; Loại A; Loại AA; Loại B; Chất lượng Lion; Khác
nb: Eggkvalitet: Klasse A; Klasse B; Klasse C; Grad A; Grad AA; Grad B; Lion Quality; Annet
lt-LT: Kiaušinių klasė: A klasė; B klasė; C klasė; A klasė; AA klasė; B klasė; „Lion Quality“; Kita
el: Ποιότητα αυγού: Κατηγορία A; Κατηγορία B; Κατηγορία C; Βαθμός A; Βαθμός AA; Βαθμός B; Ποιότητα Lion; Άλλο
pl: Klasa jakości jaj: Klasa A; Klasa B; Klasa C; Klasa A (Grade A); Klasa AA (Grade AA); Klasa B (Grade B); Lion Quality; Inne
hu: Tojásminőség: "A" osztályú; "B" osztályú; "C" osztályú; "A" osztályú (Grade A); "AA" osztályú; "B" osztályú (Grade B); Oroszlános minősítésű (Lion Quality); Egyéb
fi: Munan laatuluokka: A-luokka; B-luokka; C-luokka; A-luokka; AA-luokka; B-luokka; Lion Quality; Muu